Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.130

Solid waste or recyclable materials collection—Ordinance.

A solid waste or recyclable materials collection ordinance may:

(1) Require property owners and occupants of premises to use the solid waste collection and disposal system or recyclable materials collection and disposal system, and to dispose of their solid waste and recyclable materials as provided in the ordinance: PROVIDED, That a solid waste or recycling ordinance shall not require any retail enterprise engaged in the sale of consumer-packaged products to locate or place a public recycling collection site or buy-back center upon or within a certain distance of the retail establishment as a condition of engaging in the sale of consumer-packaged products; and

(2) Fix charges for solid waste collection and disposal, recyclable materials collection and disposal, or both, and the manner and time of payment therefor including therein a provision that upon failure to pay the charges, the amount thereof shall become a lien against the property for which the solid waste or recyclable materials collection service is rendered. The ordinance may also provide penalties for its violation.

[ 1989 c 431 s 51; 1965 c 7 s 35.21.130. Prior: 1943 c 270 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9504-1, part.]